Maryland, session 2026, HB0070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The State Highway Administration shall study and make recommendations
on the implementation of a consistent statewide policy for the use of traffic calming devices
on highways in the State.
(b) The study shall include:
(1) research on best practices for the implementation and use of traffic
calming devices;
(2) recommended guidelines for determining the circumstances under
which a traffic calming device should be used;
(3) recommendations on providing technical support to counties and
municipalities on the implementation and use of traffic calming devices; and
(4) a list of academic, nonprofit, or other entities that could provide
assistance in the development and implementation of a statewide policy on the use of traffic
calming devices.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0070*

HOUSE BILL 70
(c) On or before December 1, 2026, the State Highway Administration shall
report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.